Tennessee, session 114, SB1921.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-1204(a), is amended by adding
the language ", except as provided in § 71-5-1205," immediately after "remain unobligated".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 5, Part 12, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
71-5-1205.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Child care and development fund" or "CCDF" means the federal child
care and development fund established in 45 CFR 98; and
(2) "Smart steps program" means the state child care assistance
program administered by the department.
(b)
(1) The department shall annually transfer a portion of the TANF rainy-
day fund, as described in § 71-5-1204, to the child care and development fund in
an amount sufficient to fund participation in the smart steps program by a family
who:
(A) Meets the eligibility requirements of the smart steps program;
(B) Elects to participate in the program; and
(C) Is unable to be served due to insufficient CCDF funds.
(2) Such funds must not be utilized to supplant any current use of the
child care and development fund.
SB1921
011335
- 1 -

(c) The TANF rainy-day funds transferred, as described in subsection (a), must
not exceed thirty percent (30%), as described in Title IV-A of the Social Security Act (42
U.S.C. § 604) or any other amount permitted by the federal government.
(d) The eligible limit, sliding scale fee schedule, and co-pay policies for the smart
steps program that were in effect on September 30, 2025, must be utilized as a
minimum standard for such program.
(e) The department shall annually publish on the department's website a report
on the temporary assistance for needy families program's and the child care and
development fund's balances and expenditures. The report must include:
(1) Expenditures in the prior fiscal year by expense category;
(2) Obligated balances by expense category; and
(3) Any unobligated balance.
(f) The department is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate this section.
The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011335